Idaho statutes. Title 14 ESTATES OF DECEDENTS
Chapter 5
UNCLAIMED PROPERTY LAW

Sec.

§ 14-501. Definitions and use of terms.

As used in this chapter:

“Administrator” means the state treasurer or his or her duly authorized agents or employees.

“Apparent owner” means the person whose name appears on the records of the holder as the person entitled to property held, issued, or owing by the holder.

“Attorney general” means the chief legal officer of this state.

“Banking organization” means a bank, trust company, savings bank, industrial bank, land bank, safe deposit company, private banker, or any organization defined by other law as a bank or banking organization.

“Business association” means a nonpublic corporation, limited liability company, joint stock company, investment company, business trust, partnership, or association for business purposes of two (2) or more individuals, whether or not for profit, including, but not limited to, a banking organization, financial organization, insurance company, or utility.

“Domicile” means the state of incorporation of a corporation and the state of the principal place of business of an unincorporated person.

“Financial organization” means a savings and loan association, cooperative bank, building and loan association, investment company, or credit union.

“Holder” means a person, wherever organized or domiciled, who is:

In possession of property belonging to another;

A trustee; or

Indebted to another on an obligation.

“Insurance company” means an association, corporation, fraternal or mutual benefit organization, whether or not for profit, which is engaged in providing insurance coverage, including accident, burial, casualty, credit life, contract performance, dental, fidelity, fire, health, hospitalization, illness, life, including endowments and annuities, malpractice, marine, mortgage, surety, and wage protection insurance.

“Intangible property” includes:

Moneys, checks, drafts, deposits, interest, dividends, and income;

Credit balances, customer overpayments, gift certificates, security deposits, refunds, credit memos, unpaid wages, unused airline tickets, and unidentified remittances;

Stocks and other intangible ownership interests in business associations;

Amounts paid for tickets, passes or vouchers to gain entrance to a scheduled event where the scheduled event was canceled and not rescheduled, and the owner of the tickets, passes or vouchers is entitled to a refund in cash, services or merchandise;

Moneys deposited to redeem stocks, bonds, coupons, and other securities, or to make distributions;

Amounts due and payable under the terms of insurance policies;

Amounts distributable from a trust or custodial fund established under a plan to provide health, welfare, pension, vacation, severance, retirement, death, stock purchase, profit sharing, employee savings, supplemental unemployment insurance, or similar benefits; and

Any interest created by a judgment entered in any court of competent jurisdiction in favor of persons who are members of a class of persons defined by the court entering the judgment.

“Last known address” means a description of the location of the apparent owner sufficient for the purpose of the delivery of mail.

“Owner” means a depositor in the case of a deposit, a beneficiary in case of a trust other than a deposit in trust, a creditor, claimant, or payee in the case of other intangible property, or a person having a legal or equitable interest in property subject to this act or his legal representative.

“Person” means an individual, business association, state or other government, governmental subdivision or agency, public corporation, public authority, estate, trust, two (2) or more persons having a joint or common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“State” means any state, district, commonwealth, territory, insular possession, or any other area subject to the legislative authority of the United States.

“Utility” means a person who owns or operates for public use any plant, equipment, property, franchise, or license for the transmission of communications or the production, storage, transmission, sale, delivery, or furnishing of electricity, water, steam, or gas.

Section 19 of S.L. 1997, ch. 399 read, “This act shall be in full force and effect on and after its passage and approval, and shall be effective July 1, 1997, except that this act shall have retroactive application to January 1, 1981, for the purposes of any audits or similar adjustments proposed by the administrator to ascertain compliance with the provisions of chapter 5, title 14, Idaho Code, in effect from January 1, 1981, to July 1, 1997. No person who has paid unclaimed property to the administrator between January 1, 1981, and July 1, 1997, shall have any right or claim to a refund or repayment of such unclaimed property or the value thereof solely because of the limited retroactive application of this act.”
OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

§ 14-501A. General principles. [Repealed.]

§ 14-502. Property presumed abandoned — General rule.

Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, all intangible property, including any income or increment derived therefrom, less any lawful charges, that is held, issued, or owing in the ordinary course of a holder’s business and has remained unclaimed by the owner for more than five (5) years after it became payable or distributable is presumed abandoned.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the following items shall not constitute abandoned property for the purposes of this act:

Amounts withheld by a business association as a penalty or forfeiture or as damages in the event a person who has reserved the services of the business association fails to make use of and pay for the service;

Gift certificates with an expiration date prominently displayed on their face;

Nonrefundable airline tickets;

Any certificate, pass, voucher or other evidence of a right or privilege which is nonrefundable or which is nonredeemable due to the passage of time;

Any intangible property as defined in section 14-501, Idaho Code, with a value of fifty dollars ($50.00) or less.

Property is payable or distributable for the purpose of this chapter notwithstanding the owner’s failure to make demand or to present any instrument or document required to receive payment.

§ 14-503. General rules for taking custody of intangible unclaimed property.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter or by other statute of this state, intangible property is subject to the custody of this state as unclaimed property if the conditions raising a presumption of abandonment under sections 14-502 and 14-505 through 14-516, Idaho Code, are satisfied and:

The last known address, as shown on the records of the holder, of the apparent owner is in this state;

The records of the holder do not reflect the identity of the person entitled to the property and it is established that the last known address of the person entitled to the property is in this state;

The records of the holder do not reflect the last known address of the apparent owner, and it is established that:

The last known address of the person entitled to the property is in this state, or

The holder is a domiciliary or a government or governmental subdivision or agency of this state and has not previously paid or delivered the property to the state of the last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property;

The last known address, as shown on the records of the holder, of the apparent owner is in a state that does not provide by law for the escheat or custodial taking of the property or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not applicable to the property and the holder is a domiciliary or a government or governmental subdivision or agency of this state;

The last known address, as shown on the records of the holder, of the apparent owner is in a foreign nation and the holder is a domiciliary or a government or governmental subdivision or agency of this state; or

The transaction out of which the property arose occurred in this state; and

1. The last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property is unknown, or

The holder is a domiciliary of a state that does not provide by law for the escheat or custodial taking of the property or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not applicable to the property.

2. The last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property is in a state that does not provide by law for the escheat or custodial taking of the property or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not applicable to the property; and

§ 14-504. Travelers checks and money orders.

Subject to subsection (4) of this section, any sum payable on a travelers check that has been outstanding for more than fifteen (15) years after its issuance is presumed abandoned unless the owner, within fifteen (15) years, has communicated in writing with the issuer concerning it or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the issuer.

Subject to subsection (4) of this section, any sum payable on a money order or similar written instrument, other than a third-party bank check, that has been outstanding for more than seven (7) years after its issuance is presumed abandoned unless the owner, within seven (7) years, has communicated in writing with the issuer concerning it or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the issuer.

A holder may not deduct from the amount of a travelers check or money order any charge imposed by reason of the failure to present the instrument for payment unless there is a valid and enforceable written contract between the issuer and the owner of the instrument pursuant to which the issuer may impose a charge and the issuer regularly imposes such charges and does not regularly reverse or otherwise cancel them.

No sum payable on a travelers check, money order, or similar written instrument, other than a third-party bank check, described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section may be subjected to the custody of this state as unclaimed property unless:

The records of the issuer show that the travelers check, money order, or similar written instrument was purchased in this state;

The issuer has its principal place of business in this state and the records of the issuer do not show the state in which the travelers check, money order, or similar written instrument was purchased; or

The issuer has its principal place of business in this state, the records of the issuer show the state in which the travelers check, money order, or similar written instrument was purchased and the laws of the state of purchase do not provide for the escheat or custodial taking of the property or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not applicable to the property.

§ 14-505. Checks, drafts and similar instruments issued or certified by banking and financial organizations.

Any sum payable on a check, draft, or similar instrument, except those subject to section 14-504, Idaho Code, on which a banking or financial organization is directly liable, including a cashier’s check and a certified check, which has been outstanding for more than five (5) years after it was payable or after its issuance if payable on demand, is presumed abandoned, unless the owner, within five (5) years, has communicated in writing with the banking or financial organization concerning it or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee thereof.

A holder may not deduct from the amount of any instrument subject to this section any charge imposed by reason of the failure to present the instrument for payment unless there is a valid and enforceable written contract between the holder and the owner of the instrument pursuant to which the holder may impose a charge, and the holder regularly imposes such charges and does not regularly reverse or otherwise cancel them.

§ 14-506. Bank deposits and funds in financial organizations.

Any demand, savings, or matured time deposit with a banking or financial organization, including a deposit that is automatically renewable, and any funds paid toward the purchase of a share, a mutual investment certificate, or any other interest in a banking or financial organization is presumed abandoned unless the owner, within five (5) years, has:

In the case of a deposit, increased or decreased its amount or presented the passbook or other similar evidence of the deposit for the crediting of interest;

Communicated in writing with the banking or financial organization concerning the property;

Otherwise established that the owner is currently aware of his interest in the property as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the banking or financial organization describing the activity of the owner which establishes that the owner is currently aware of his interest in the property stating the date of such activity and the address of the owner as of that date;

Owned other property to which paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of this subsection applies and if the banking or financial organization communicates in writing with the owner with regard to the property that would otherwise be presumed abandoned under this subsection at the address to which communications regarding the other property regularly are sent; or

Had another relationship with the banking or financial organization concerning which the owner has:

Communicated in writing with the banking or financial organization; or

Otherwise established that the owner is currently aware of his interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the banking or financial organization describing the activity of the owner which establishes that the owner is currently aware of his interest, stating the date of such activity and the address of the owner as of that date.

For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, property includes interest and dividends.

A holder may not impose with respect to property described in subsection (1) of this section any charge due to dormancy or inactivity or cease payment of interest unless:

There is an enforceable written contract between the holder and the owner of the property pursuant to which the holder may impose a charge or cease payment of interest;

For property in excess of two dollars ($2.00), the holder, no more than three (3) months before the initial imposition of those charges or cessation of interest, has given written notice to the owner of the amount of those charges at the last known address of the owner stating that those charges will be imposed or that interest will cease, but the notice provided in this section need not be given with respect to charges imposed or interest ceased before the effective date of this chapter; and

The holder regularly imposes such charges or ceases payment of interest and does not regularly reverse or otherwise cancel them or retroactively credit interest with respect to the property.

§ 14-507. Funds owing under life insurance policies.

Funds held or owing under any life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract that has matured or terminated are presumed abandoned if unclaimed for more than five (5) years after the funds become due and payable as established from the records of the insurance company holding or owing the funds, but property described in subsection (3)(b) of this section is presumed abandoned if unclaimed for more than two (2) years.

If a person other than the insured or annuitant is entitled to the funds and an address of the person is not known to the company or it is not definite and certain from the records of the company who is entitled to the funds, it is presumed that the last known address of the person entitled to the funds is the same as the last known address of the insured or annuitant according to the records of the company.

For purposes of this chapter, a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract not matured by actual proof of the death of the insured or annuitant according to the records of the company is matured and the proceeds due and payable if:

The company knows that the insured or annuitant has died; or

The insured has attained, or would have attained if he were living, the limiting age under the mortality table on which the reserve is based;

The relationship of each beneficiary to the insured.

For purposes of this chapter, the application of an automatic premium loan provision or other nonforfeiture provision contained in an insurance policy does not prevent a policy from being matured or terminated under subsection (1) of this section if the insured has died or the insured or the beneficiary of the policy otherwise has become entitled to the proceeds thereof before the depletion of the cash surrender value of a policy by the application of those provisions.

If the laws of this state or the terms of the life insurance policy require the company to give notice to the insured or owner that an automatic premium loan provision or other nonforfeiture provision has been exercised and the notice, given to an insured or owner whose last known address according to the records of the company is in this state, is undeliverable, the company shall make a reasonable search to ascertain the policyholder’s correct address to which the notice must be mailed.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the company learns of the death of the insured or annuitant and the beneficiary has not communicated with the insurer within four (4) months after the death, the company shall take reasonable steps to pay the proceeds to the beneficiary.

Commencing two (2) years after the effective date of this chapter, every change of beneficiary form issued by an insurance company under any life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract to an insured or owner who is a resident of this state must request the following information:
(a) The name of each beneficiary, or if a class of beneficiaries is named, the name of each current beneficiary in the class;

2. The policy was in force at the time the insured attained, or would have attained, the limiting age specified in subparagraph 1.; and

3. Neither the insured nor any other person appearing to have an interest in the policy within the preceding two (2) years, according to the records of the company, has assigned, readjusted, or paid premiums on the policy, subjected the policy to a loan, or corresponded in writing with the company concerning the policy.

(b) The address of each beneficiary; and

§ 14-508. Deposits held by utilities.

A deposit, including any interest thereon, made by a subscriber with a utility to secure payment or any sum paid in advance for utility services to be furnished, less any lawful deductions, that remains unclaimed by the owner for more than one (1) year after termination of services for which the deposit or advance payment was made is presumed abandoned.

The public utilities commission may certify that a utility is participating in a financial assistance program which assists the utility’s low income and disadvantaged customers with their utility bills. Upon certification to the administrator, the utility shall pay the funds which would have been presumed to be abandoned under subsection (1) of this section to the financial assistance program certified by the public utilities commission. The utility shall remain obligated to file its report of such abandoned property as required by section 14-517, Idaho Code.

§ 14-509. Refund held by business associations.

Except to the extent otherwise ordered by the court or administrative agency, any sum that a business association has been ordered to refund by a court or administrative agency which has remained unclaimed by the owner for more than one (1) year after it became payable in accordance with the final determination or order providing for the refund, whether or not the final determination or order requires any person entitled to a refund to make a claim for it, is presumed abandoned.

§ 14-510. Stock and other intangible interests in business associations.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, any stock, shareholding or other intangible ownership interest in a business association, the existence of which is evidenced by records available to the association, is considered abandoned if:

The interest in the association is owned by a person who within five (5) years has failed to:

Claim a dividend, distribution or other sum payable as a result of the interest; or

Communicate with the association regarding the interest or a dividend, distribution or other sum payable as the result of the interest, as evidenced by memorandum or other record on file with the association prepared by an employee of the association; and

The association does not know the location of the owner at the end of the five (5) year period. The return of official shareholder notifications or communications by the postal service as undeliverable is evidence that the association does not know the location of the owner.

This chapter applies to:

The underlying stock, shareholdings or other intangible ownership interests of an owner;

Any stock, shareholdings or other intangible ownership interest of an owner when the business association is in possession of the certificate or other evidence of ownership; and

The stock, shareholdings or other intangible ownership interests of dividend and nondividend paying business association, whether or not the interest is represented by a certificate.

At the time an interest is considered abandoned under this section, any dividend, distribution or other sum then held for or owing to the owner as a result of the interest, and not previously presumed abandoned, is considered abandoned.

This chapter does not apply to any stock or other intangible ownership interest enrolled in a plan that provides for the automatic reinvestment of dividends, distributions or other sums payable as a result of the interest unless:
(4)(a) This chapter does not apply to any stock or other intangible ownership interest enrolled in a plan that provides for the automatic reinvestment of dividends, distributions or other sums payable as a result of the interest unless:

The records available to the administrator of the plan show that the owner has not within five (5) years communicated in any manner described in subsection (1) of this section[.]; or

Five (5) years have elapsed since the location of the owner became unknown to the association, as evidenced by the return of official shareholder notifications or communications by the postal service as undeliverable, and the owner has not within those five (5) years communicated in any manner described in this chapter.

The five (5) year period from the return of official notifications or communications begins at the earlier of the return of the second of those notifications or communications or the time the holder discontinues mailings to the shareholder.

§ 14-511. Property of business associations held in course of dissolution.

Intangible property distributable in the course of a dissolution of a business association which remains unclaimed by the owner will be remitted as unclaimed property on the date of final distribution.

§ 14-512. Property held by agents and fiduciaries.

Intangible property and any income or increment derived therefrom held in a fiduciary capacity for the benefit of another person is presumed abandoned unless the owner, within five (5) years after it has become payable or distributable, has increased or decreased the principal, accepted payment of principal or income, or communicated concerning the property.

Amounts due and payable from property in an individual retirement account, defined benefit plan, or other account or plan that is qualified for tax deferral under the income tax laws of the United States, is presumed abandoned three (3) years after the earlier of the date of the required distribution as stated in the documents governing the account or plan, or the date, if determinable by the holder, specified in the income tax law of the United States by which distribution of the property must begin in order to avoid a tax penalty, but excluding property in any such account or plan if the documents governing the account or plan provide a method for the treatment of the account balance of an account holder or plan participant or beneficiary who cannot be located.

For the purposes of this section, a person who holds property as an agent for a business association is deemed to hold the property in a fiduciary capacity for that business association alone, unless the agreement between him and the business association provides otherwise.

For the purposes of this chapter, a person who is deemed to hold property in a fiduciary capacity for a business association alone is the holder of the property only insofar as the interest of the business association in the property is concerned, and the business association is the holder of the property insofar as the interest of any other person in the property is concerned.

§ 14-513. Property held by courts and public agencies.

Intangible property held for the owner by a court, state or other government, governmental subdivision or agency, public corporation, or public authority which remains unclaimed by the owner for more than one (1) year after becoming payable or distributable is presumed abandoned.

If witness and juror fees or mileage payments are not claimed by the owner within one (1) year of the date of issuance of a check or warrant, the fees or mileage payments shall remain the property of the county and shall be remitted to the district court fund.

§ 14-514. Gift certificates and credit memos.

A gift certificate without an expiration date prominently displayed on its face or a credit memo issued in the ordinary course of an issuer’s business which remains unclaimed by the owner for more than five (5) years after becoming payable or distributable is presumed abandoned.

In the case of a gift certificate without an expiration date prominently displayed on its face, the amount presumed abandoned is the price paid by the purchaser for the gift certificate. In the case of a credit memo, the amount presumed abandoned is the amount credited to the recipient of the memo.

§ 14-515. Wages.

Unpaid wages, including wages represented by unpresented payroll checks, owing in the ordinary course of the holder’s business which remain unclaimed by the owner for more than one (1) year after becoming payable are presumed abandoned.

§ 14-516. Contents of safe deposit box or other safekeeping repository.

All tangible and intangible property held in a safe deposit box or any other safekeeping repository in this state in the ordinary course of the holder’s business and proceeds resulting from the sale of the property permitted by other law, which remain unclaimed by the owner for more than five (5) years after the lease or rental period on the box or other repository has expired, are presumed abandoned.

§ 14-517. Report of abandoned property.

A person holding property tangible or intangible, presumed abandoned and subject to custody as unclaimed property under this chapter, shall report to the administrator concerning the property as provided in this section.

The report must be verified and must include:

Except with respect to traveler’s checks and money orders, the name, if known, and last known address, if any, of each person appearing from the records of the holder to be the owner of property presumed abandoned under this chapter;

In the case of unclaimed funds of more than fifty dollars ($50.00) held or owing under any life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract, the full name and last known address of the insured or annuitant and of the beneficiary according to the records of the insurance company holding or owing the funds;

In the case of the contents of a safe deposit box or other safekeeping repository or of other tangible property, a description of the property and the place where it is held and may be inspected by the administrator and any amounts owing to the holder;

The nature and identifying number, if any, or description of the property and the amount appearing from the records to be due;

The date the property became payable, demandable, or returnable, and the date of the last transaction with the apparent owner with respect to the property; and

Other information the administrator prescribes by rule as necessary for the administration of the provisions of this chapter.

If the person holding property presumed abandoned and subject to custody as unclaimed property is a successor to other persons who previously held the property for the apparent owner or the holder has changed his name while holding the property, he shall file with his report all known names and addresses of each previous holder of the property.

The report must be filed no later than November 1 of each year as of June 30 next preceding. On written request by any person required to file a report, the administrator may postpone the reporting date.

All holders of property presumed abandoned under this section that know the whereabouts of the owner of such property shall, before filing the annual report, communicate with the owner and take necessary steps to prevent abandonment from being presumed. Not more than one hundred twenty (120) days before filing the report required by this section, the holder in possession of property presumed abandoned and subject to custody as unclaimed property under this chapter shall send written notice to the apparent owner at his last known address informing him that the holder is in possession of property subject to this chapter if the holder has in its records an address for the apparent owner which the holder’s records do not disclose to be inaccurate.

The written notice required under this section shall include the name and address of the apparent owner, the nature and amount of the property presumed abandoned in the holder’s possession, the name and address of the holder of the property presumed abandoned, a request that the apparent owner identify whether the property presumed abandoned is or is not unclaimed property under this chapter, and the reasons therefor, and any other criteria the administrator deems appropriate.
(7) If the apparent owner completes and returns the written notice described in subsection (6) of this section to the holder, and the apparent owner indicates a claim to the property presumed abandoned or indicates that the property identified in the written notice is not abandoned property, the holder need not pay or deliver the property to the administrator, and the property shall not be considered abandoned.

If the apparent owner completes and returns the written notice described in subsection (6) of this section to the holder, and the apparent owner indicates a claim to the property presumed abandoned or indicates that the property identified in the written notice is not abandoned property, the holder need not pay or deliver the property to the administrator, and the property shall not be considered abandoned.

In the event a holder receives a written notice as described in subsection (7) of this section demonstrating that certain property is not abandoned, a new presumption of abandonment may arise for such property due to the passage of time. The date the holder receives the written notice shall be deemed the date such property became payable or distributable for the purposes of calculating whether a presumption of abandonment has arisen.

A report filed pursuant to this section shall be presumed accurate if the holder has maintained adequate records sufficient to establish by a preponderance of evidence that each item on the report is accurate and correct.

Any person or holder in possession of ten (10) or more items of unclaimed property must submit an accurate electronic report in the format prescribed by the administrator.

§ 14-518. Notice and publication of lists of abandoned property.

The administrator shall establish, maintain and update at least quarterly a current list of all reported owners of abandoned property on a website that is connected to or that may be accessed from the website maintained by the state treasurer. At least one (1) week before each quarterly website posting of such list, the administrator shall publish a notice in the official newspaper of each Idaho county stating when and where the quarterly website listing of Idaho abandoned property will be accessible to citizens. Provided however, the names and addresses of owners located in a state which will receive the accounts because of reciprocal agreements as permitted by section 14-535, Idaho Code, need not be listed.

The list maintained by the administrator must contain:

The names, in alphabetical order, of persons listed in any report of abandoned property filed with the administrator and entitled to notice;

A statement that information concerning the property may be obtained by any person possessing an interest in the property by addressing an inquiry to the administrator; and

A statement that the property is in the custody of the administrator and all claims must be directed to the administrator.

The administrator is not required to list any items of less than one hundred dollars ($100) unless the administrator considers the inclusion of such property in the list to be in the public interest.

This section is not applicable to sums payable on traveler’s checks, money orders, and other written instruments presumed abandoned under section 14-504, Idaho Code.

The administrator may undertake other public outreach efforts to:

Inform owners of abandoned property of the location and process for retrieving such property, including participation in public events, placement of media advertisements, and publication and distribution of brochures or flyers; and

Educate holders of property on the requirements of this chapter.

§ 14-519. Payment or delivery of abandoned property.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, and subsection (2) of section 14-508, Idaho Code, a person who is required to file a report under section 14-517, Idaho Code, shall pay or deliver to the administrator all abandoned property together with the report required under section 14-517, Idaho Code.

If the owner establishes the right to receive the abandoned property to the satisfaction of the holder before the property has been delivered or it appears that for some other reason the presumption of abandonment is erroneous, the holder need not pay or deliver the property to the administrator, and the property will no longer be presumed abandoned.

The holder of an interest under section 14-510, Idaho Code, shall deliver a duplicate certificate or other evidence of ownership if the holder does not issue certificates of ownership to the administrator. Upon delivery of a duplicate certificate to the administrator, the holder and any transfer agent, registrar, or other person acting for or on behalf of a holder in executing or delivering the duplicate certificate is relieved of all liability of every kind in accordance with the provisions of section 14-520, Idaho Code, to every person, including any person acquiring the original certificate or the duplicate of the certificate issued to the administrator, for any losses or damages resulting to any person by the issuance and delivery to the administrator of the duplicate certificate.

§ 14-520. Custody by state, holder relieved from liability — Reimbursement of holder paying claim — Reclaiming for owner — Defense of holder — Payment of safe deposit box or repository charges.

Upon the payment or delivery of property to the administrator, the state assumes custody and responsibility for the safekeeping of the property. A person who pays or delivers property to the administrator in good faith is relieved of all liability to the extent of the value of the property paid or delivered for any claim then existing or which thereafter may arise or be made in respect to the property.

A holder who has paid money to the administrator pursuant to this chapter may make payment to any person appearing to the holder to be entitled to payment and, upon filing proof of payment and proof that the payee was entitled thereto, the administrator shall promptly reimburse the holder for the payment without imposing any fee or other charge. If reimbursement is sought for a payment made on a negotiable instrument, including a travelers check or money order, the holder must be reimbursed under this subsection upon filing proof that the instrument was duly presented and that payment was made to a person who appeared to the holder to be entitled to payment. The holder must be reimbursed for payment made under this subsection even if the payment was made to a person whose claim was barred under section 14-529, Idaho Code.

A holder who has delivered property, including a certificate of any interest in a business association, other than money to the administrator pursuant to this chapter may reclaim the property if still in the possession of the administrator, without paying any fee or other charge, upon filing proof that the owner has claimed the property from the holder.

The administrator may accept the holder’s affidavit as sufficient proof of the facts that entitle the holder to recover money and property under this section.

If the holder pays or delivers property to the administrator in good faith and thereafter another person claims the property from the holder or another state claims the money or property under its laws relating to escheat or abandoned or unclaimed property, the administrator, upon written notice of the claim, shall defend the holder against the claim and indemnify the holder against any liability on the claim.

For the purposes of this section, “good faith” means that:

Payment or delivery was made in a reasonable attempt to comply with the provisions of this chapter;

The person delivering the property was not a fiduciary then in breach of trust in respect to the property and had a reasonable basis for believing, based on the facts then known to him, that the property was abandoned for the purposes of this chapter; and

There is no showing that the records pursuant to which the delivery was made did not meet reasonable commercial standards of practice in the industry.

§ 14-521. Crediting of dividends, interest, or increments to owner’s account.

Whenever property other than money is paid or delivered to the administrator under this chapter, the owner is entitled to receive from the administrator any dividends, interest, or other increments realized or accruing on the property at or before liquidation or conversion thereof into money.